District of Columbia statutes.
32-224

Board of Education authorized to enforce subchapter, make regulations, delegate functions, and appoint inspectors.

The Board of Education of the District of Columbia is hereby empowered to carry out and enforce the provisions of this subchapter, and is authorized to promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter. The Board of Education is further authorized to delegate the performance of any of its functions and duties under this subchapter to any officer, agent, or department of the Board, and to appoint such number of child labor inspectors or other employees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1006, ch. 908, § 29
renumbered as § 25 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(29), 23 DCR 528
This section is referenced in § 32-213.
1981 Ed., § 36-523.
1973 Ed., § 36-227.